Illinois, session 104th, HB4171.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Sports Wagering Act is amended by adding 5Section 25-115 as follows: 6    (230 ILCS 45/25-115 new)7    Sec. 25-115. Home rule. 8    (a) The regulation and licensing of sports wagering, 9including, but not limited to, the imposition of fees, 10surcharges, or other costs for the privilege of conducting or 11participating in sports wagering, are exclusive powers and 12functions of the State. A home rule unit may not regulate or 13license sports wagering. This subsection (a) is a denial and 14limitation of home rule powers and functions under subsection 15(h) of Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution.16    (b) A home rule unit may not impose or collect a tax on 17sports wagering or a tax on receipts generated from sports 18wagering. This subsection (b) is a denial and limitation of 19home rule powers and functions under subsection (g) of Section 206 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution.  21    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 22becoming law.